Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.9 The Good Samaritan Overdose Prevention Act of 2016

21-28.9-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Good Samaritan Overdose Prevention Act of 2016.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 2, § 1.

21-28.9-2.
Definition.

“Opioid antagonist” means a drug which is a competitive antagonist that binds to the opioid receptors with higher affinity than agonists but does not activate the receptors, effectively blocking the receptor, preventing the human body from making use of opiates and endorphins.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 2, § 1.

21-28.9-3.
Authority to administer opioid antagonists — Release from liability.

A person may administer an opioid antagonist to another person if:

They, in good faith, believe the other person is experiencing a drug overdose; and

They act with reasonable care in administering the drug to the other person.

Any person, including law enforcement personnel and emergency medical personnel, who administers an opioid antagonist to another person pursuant to this section shall not be subject to civil liability or criminal prosecution as a result of the administration of the drug.

State and municipal law enforcement personnel and emergency medical personnel to include, but not limited to, emergency medical technicians (EMTs), paramedics, and fire department personnel may provide and transfer an opioid antagonist to an individual or to his or her responsible family member, friend, or other person, along with instructions on administration and use of the opioid antagonist, to provide opioid overdose protection to the individual, in the good-faith judgment of the law enforcement or emergency medical personnel, who is at substantial risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose event. Law enforcement and emergency medical personnel may exercise their good-faith judgment based on their experience, training, knowledge, observations, and information provided by the individual at substantial risk of experiencing an opioid-related overdose event or from the individual’s family, friend, or others with knowledge of the individual’s prior opioid use.

State and municipal law enforcement personnel and emergency medical personnel acting in good faith shall not, as a result of acts or omission in providing services in accordance with subsection (c), be liable for civil damages, unless the acts or omission constitute willful and wanton misconduct.

Law enforcement officers or agencies participating in the HOPE (Heroin-Opioid Prevention Effort) initiative or program and acting in good faith shall not, as the result of acts or omissions in providing services, be subject to civil liability or criminal prosecution unless the acts or omissions constitute willful and wanton misconduct.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 250, § 1.

21-28.9-3.1.
Narcotic testing product.

Any person may provide, administer, or utilize a narcotic testing product to assist another person in determining whether a narcotic or substance contains chemicals, toxic substances, or hazardous compounds. Narcotic testing products shall include, but not be limited to, fentanyl test strips.

A person who provides, administers, or utilizes a narcotic testing product to assist another person shall not be subject to civil liability or criminal prosecution as a result of providing, administering, or utilizing the narcotic testing product to assist another person.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 275, § 1.

21-28.9-4.
Emergency overdose care — Immunity from legal repercussions.

Any person who, in good faith, without malice and in the absence of evidence of an intent to defraud, seeks medical assistance for someone experiencing a drug or alcohol overdose or other drug- or alcohol-related medical emergency shall not be charged or prosecuted for any crime related to the possession of a controlled substance or drug paraphernalia, or the operation of a drug-involved premises, if the evidence for the charge was gained as a result of the seeking of medical assistance.

A person who experiences a drug or alcohol overdose or other drug- or alcohol-related medical emergency and is in need of medical assistance shall not be charged or prosecuted for any crime related to the possession of a controlled substance or drug paraphernalia, possession or transportation of alcohol by an underage person, or the operation of a drug-involved premises, if the evidence for the charge was gained as a result of the overdose and the need for medical assistance.

The act of providing first aid or other medical assistance to someone who is experiencing a drug or alcohol overdose or other drug- or alcohol-related medical emergency may be used as a mitigating factor in a criminal prosecution pursuant to the controlled substances act.

The immunity related to the possession of a controlled substance or drug paraphernalia, possession or transportation of alcohol by an underage person, or the operation of a drug-involved premises afforded under this section shall also extend to a violation of probation and/or parole on those grounds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 195, § 1.

21-28.9-5.
Law enforcement reports.

In the first week of January, 2017, and each year thereafter, the attorney general shall, in cooperation with local law enforcement agencies and the state police, submit to the general assembly a report summarizing the impact of this chapter on law enforcement. The report shall include any incidents in which a law enforcement agency was barred, due to the immunity provisions of §

21-28.9-4

, from charging or prosecuting a person under chapters 28 and 28.5 of this title, and under §

3-8-9

or §

3-8-10

, who would have otherwise been so charged or prosecuted, and indicating whether the person was charged with, or prosecuted for, any other criminal offense resulting from the agency’s response to the request for medical assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 195, § 1.